Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.24.020

Designation of short terms, full terms, and unexpired terms—Filing declarations—Election to both short and full terms.

If at the same election there are short terms or full terms and unexpired terms of office to be filled, the filing officer shall distinguish them and designate the short term, the full term, and the unexpired term, as such, or by use of the words "short term," "unexpired two year term," or "four year term," as the case may be.

When both a short term and a full term for the same position are scheduled to be voted upon, or when a short term is created after the close of the filing period, a single declaration of candidacy accompanied by a single filing fee shall be construed as a filing for both the short term and the full term and the name of such candidate shall appear upon the ballot for the position sought with the designation "short term and full term." The candidate elected to both such terms shall be sworn into and assume office for the short term as soon as the election returns have been certified and shall again be sworn into office for the full term.

[ 2013 c 11 s 30; 2003 c 111 s 602. Prior: 1990 c 59 s 92; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120 s 4; 1965 c 9 s 29.21.140; prior: (i) 1927 c 155 s 1, part; 1925 ex.s. c 68 s 1, part; 1921 c 116 s 1, part; 1919 c 85 s 1, part; 1911 c 101 s 1, part; 1909 c 82 s 11, part; 1907 c 209 s 38, part; RRS s 5212, part. (ii) 1933 c 85 s 1, part; RRS s 5213-1, part. Formerly RCW 29.15.140, 29.21.140.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120: See note following RCW 29A.52.210.

Term of person elected to fill vacancy: RCW 42.12.030.

Vacancies in public office, how filled: RCW 42.12.010.